Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.249

Keep Kids Safe license plates.

"Keep Kids Safe license plates" means license plates issued under RCW 46.18.200 that display artwork recognizing efforts to prevent child abuse and neglect in Washington state.

[ 2011 c 171 s 14; 2005 c 53 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2011 c 171: See notes following RCW 4.24.210.